West Virginia, session 2026, HB4592.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 4. general administration. §18B-4-5c. Standardized campus safety mapping data. Each state institution of higher education shall create standardized campus safety mapping data that at a minimum, requires that mapping data:(1) Be in formats that conform to, integrate with, and are accessible within software  platforms used in local public safety answering points and by the city, county, state, and federalpublic safety agencies that could provide emergency services on campus without requiring the purchase of additional software or payment of fees to access the data;(2) Be in formats capable of being printed, shared electronically, and, if requested, digitally integrated into interactive mobile platforms in use;(3) Be viewable and printable from open-source document or image viewers;(4) Be oriented to true north and include a fixed grid with consistent "x" and "y" coordinates; (5) Have its accuracy verified by the entity producing the data through an on-site walk-through of the campus buildings and grounds;(6) Include accurate floor plans overlaid on current, verified aerial imagery of eachcampus building;(7) Include site-specific labeling for all campus buildings, such as room names, hallway designations, exterior doors, stairwell numbers, and the locations of hazards, critical utility controls, key boxes, automated external defibrillators, and trauma kits and campus grounds, including parking areas, athletic fields, surrounding roads, and neighboring properties; (8) Include the requirement that future updates or modifications to the campus mapping data conform to and integrate with software platforms used by the relevant public safety agencies; and(9) Be created, stored, and maintained exclusively within the United States for the entire duration of the mapping process and thereafter to ensure security of the data.(b) The campus safety mapping data prepared pursuant to subsection (a) shall be provided to local first response agencies including police, fire, emergency medical services (EMS), and any other local entities the institution determines should be consulted in accordance with this article. The data shall be provided at no cost and made permanently available to such entities.(c) In preparing campus safety mapping data, state institutions of higher education shall consult and receive approval from the primary law enforcement agency serving and supporting the institution. These shall include, but are not limited to, county, city, or municipal police departments, or Sheriff's Department, prior to procurement to ensure campus mapping data meets the requirements in this section.(d)   Any data obtained and maintained pursuant to the provisions of this section may not be subject to disclosure pursuant to the provisions of §29B-1-1 et seq. of this code.The Clerk of the House of Delegates and the Clerk of the Senate hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates  		............................................................... Clerk of the Senate				                  Originated in the House of Delegates. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  						............................................................... President of the Senate  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home